District of Columbia statutes.
1-620.03

Minimal standards applicable.

Safe and healthful conditions shall be provided all employees of the District government in accordance with applicable standards, codes, rules and regulations, and shall be consistent with the occupational safety and health standards promulgated by the United States Department of Labor under the provisions of the Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970, as amended (84 Stat. 1590), and applicable codes, rules and regulations including, but not limited to:

(1)

The D.C. Occupational Safety and Health Board Occupational Safety and Health Standards (11B D.C.R.R.);

(2)

The Building Code approved pursuant to the Construction Codes Approval and Amendments Act of 1986;

(3)

The Electrical Code approved pursuant to the Construction Codes Approval and Amendments Act of 1986;

(4)

The Fire Prevention Code approved pursuant to the Construction Codes Approval and Amendments Act of 1986; and

(5)

The Plumbing Code approved pursuant to the Construction Codes Approval and Amendments Act of 1986.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2003, 25 DCR 5740
Mar. 21, 1987, D.C. Law 6-216, § 13(a), 34 DCR 1072

History

1981 Ed., § 1-621.3.
1973 Ed., § 1-350.3.

Prior Codifications

References in Text

The “Construction Codes Approval and Amendments Act of 1986,” referred to throughout this section, is D.C. Law 6-216.

The D.C. Occupational Safety and Health Board Occupational Safety and Health Standards (11B D.C.R.R.), referred to in (1), are now found in 24 DCMR, Chapters 30-32.